src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NA_THEME_SUFFIX2
! Standard forms
@D.theme.IM2@0                                                                             NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Non-standard forms
@D.dim.NULL@@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                                      NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.dim.NULL@@D.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_POSS_THEME_SUFFIX
! @R.person.NULL@                                                                            NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                         NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                   NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ; ! Incorrectly using 0-poss rather than im-poss
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                                                                   NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m   NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ; ! Incorrectly using im-poss rather than 0-poss
!
! LEXICON NA_DIM_SUFFIXES
! @D.person.NULL@          NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @R.person.NULL@ NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Independent NAs
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs   NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsîs         NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@%>i2%^DIMs   NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@+Der/Dim+N+A:@D.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@%>i2%^DIMsîs         NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! Dependent NAs
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMs NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@%>i2%^DIMsîs       NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.isis.ISIS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@%>i2%^DIMs NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
! @R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@R.is.IS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@+Der/Dim+N+A+D:@R.dep.DEP@@D.dim@@D.is.IS@@C.sg@@P.err2.Dim@%>i2%^DIMsîs       NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX ;
!
! LEXICON NA_POSS_THEME2_SUFFIX
! @R.person.NULL@                                                                            NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im@                                                                      NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@D.im@@P.err.Thm@:@D.person.NULL@@D.im@@P.err.Thm@%>i2m                     NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@P.err.Thm@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                 NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m   NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! @D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@0                                         NA_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_SUFFIXES
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg:@U.person.O@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@                    NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@@C.sg@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@@C.sg@%>i2nân  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px12Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2naw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.KI@@C.sg@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@@C.sg@%>i2wâw  NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px3Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@0%>i2wâw   NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@@C.sg@+Px4Sg/Pl:@U.person.O@@C.sg@%>i2thiw NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
! Unspeficied possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX:@U.person.MI@0        NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
@D.loc.NULL@ NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Obviative possessor
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thihk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
! Unspecified possessor
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk          NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Distr:@U.person.MI@%>i2nâhk      NOUN_ENDLEX ;

! POSS IM SG   SUFF
! 12   -  A    -a
! 3    -  A    -a
! 12   +  A    -im-0
! 3    +  A    -im-a
! 12   +  0    -im-0
! 3    +  0    -im-a

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_LOC_SUFFIXES
! Singular
@D.number.PL@@D.person.O@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ; ! Singular suffix: non-3rd-person possession; non-plural-only lexemes
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! non-possessed, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, im-poss, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, 0-poss, obviative -a
@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@R.person.O@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 3rd possession, 0/im-poss, obviative -a
! Plural
@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.O@%>ak NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non 3rd possessed (non-possessed), plural -ak
! Locative
@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@D.loc.NULL@@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Distr:@R.person.NULL@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No singular suffix required (may have been cancelled due possessive theme or diminutive morpheme)
@R.sg.A@+Sg:@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Singular suffix -a required
@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Singular suffix -i required
!! Potentially obsolete code
! @R.person.NULL@@D.sg@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No possession, no singular suffix
! @R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No possession, single-syllable a-singular (possessive suffix -im ruled out earlier)
! @R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! No possession, single-syllable i-singular (possessive suffix -im ruled out earlier)
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.A@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct im-poss changing single-syllable a-singular to 0-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct im-poss changing single-syllable i-singular to 0-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@D.sg@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@D.err.Thm@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct im-poss, multisyllabic 0-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@D.sg@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct im-poss, multisyllabic 0-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@D.sg@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct 0-poss, multisyllabic 0-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@D.im.IM@@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, correct 0-poss, single-syllabic a-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.A@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.A@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, incorrect 0-poss, single-syllabic a-singular
! @D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.O@@R.im.IM@@R.err.Thm@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Non-3rd possession, incorrect 0-poss, single-syllabic i-singular

!! Suffixation for inanimate nouns

LEXICON NI_POSS_GATE1
@D.person.NULL@ NI_THEME_SUFFIX1 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NI_DIM_GATE ;

LEXICON NI_THEME_SUFFIX1
! Standard forms
@D.theme.IM@0                                                    NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM@@C.sg@%>i2m                       NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@:@R.theme.IM2@@C.sg@%>i2m                     NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;
! Non-standard forms
@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@:@D.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@@C.sg@%>i2m NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM@@P.err.Thm@0                                         NI_DIM_GATE ;
@R.theme.IM2@@P.err.Thm@0                                        NI_POSS_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_DIM_GATE
@P.dim.NULL@                          NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dep@+Der/Dim+N+I:@D.dep@           NI_DIM_SUFFIX ;
@R.dep.DEP@+Der/Dim+N+I+D:@R.dep.DEP@ NI_DIM_SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NI_DIM_SUFFIX
! Standard forms
@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                               NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsîs                         NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs                                     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@D.dim@@C.sg@:@D.dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsîs                                   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
! Non-standard forms
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.DIM@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsîs   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.ISIS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMs   NI_POSS_GATE2 ;
@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@:@R.dim.IS@@P.err2.Dim@@C.sg@%>i2^DIMsîs     NI_POSS_GATE2 ;

LEXICON NI_POSS_GATE2
@D.person.NULL@ NI_THEME_SUFFIX2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES ;
